Illinois, session 104th, HB4187.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing 6Section 2705-555 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-555)  (was 20 ILCS 2705/49.13)8    Sec. 2705-555. Lease of land or property. 9    (a) The Department has the power from time to time to lease 10any land or property, with or without appurtenances, of which 11the Department has jurisdiction and that is not immediately to 12be used or developed by the State; provided that no such lease 13be for a longer period of time than that in which it can 14reasonably be expected the State will not have use for the 15property, and further provided that no such lease be for a 16longer period of time than 5 years, except as provided in 17subsections subsection (b), (c), and (d).18    (b) In counties with a population of not less than 500,000 19and not more than 800,000, a lease to any other department of 20State government, any authority, commission, or agency of the 21State, or a municipality, county, or township of the State, 22including in any land lease the corresponding vertical rights, 23subterranean and air rights, and sublease rights, may be for a   HB4187 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16000 LNS 29249 b1period of time no longer than 25 years.2    (c) In counties with a population of not less than 33,000,000, a lease initially entered into within one year 4after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 93rd 5General Assembly, including in any land lease the 6corresponding vertical rights, subterranean and air rights, 7and sublease rights, may be for a period of time no longer than 835 years. The land or property shall be leased by the 9Department at fair market value. 10    (d) In counties with a population of more than 3,000,000, 11a lease for pedestrian infrastructure over a State highway 12initially entered into within one year after the effective 13date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, 14including the corresponding vertical rights, subterranean and 15air rights, and sublease rights, may be for a period of time no 16longer than 35 years. The land or property shall be leased by 17the Department at fair market value and meet all other 18statutory requirements. 19(Source: P.A. 93-1100, eff. 3-31-05.)